test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nyenecyh_gt-norm.yaml
     ненэцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: ненэцяндмʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ненэцянд
     ненэцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ненэцьʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: ненэцяниʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: ненэцяндиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ненэцяӈгʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: ненэцямаˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: ненэцяндаˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ненэцяˮ  
     ненэцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: ненэцяндамзь
     ненэцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: ненэцяндась 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ненэцянзь 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: ненэцянинзь
     ненэцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: ненэцяндинзь
     ненэцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ненэцяӈганзь
     ненэцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: ненэцямаць 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: ненэцяндаць 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ненэцяць   
    
# Predicative Possessive forms 
     
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ненэцям
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ненэцял
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ненэцянда
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ненэцямиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ненэцялиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ненэцяндиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ненэцямаˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ненэцялаˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ненэцяндоʼ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ненэцямась
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ненэцялась 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ненэцяндась 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ненэцяминзь
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ненэцялинзь
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ненэцяндинзь
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ненэцямаць 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ненэцялаць 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ненэцяндонзь  
     
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ненэцяӈгаюн
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ненэцяӈгаюд
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ненэцяӈгаюда
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ненэцяӈгаюниʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ненэцяӈгаюдиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ненэцяӈгаюдиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ненэцяӈгаюнаˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ненэцяӈгаюдаˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ненэцяӈгаюдоʼ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ненэцяӈгаюнась
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ненэцяӈгаюдась 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ненэцяӈгаюдась 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ненэцяӈгаюнинзь
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ненэцяӈгаюдинзь
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ненэцяӈгаюдинзь
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ненэцяӈгаюнаць 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ненэцяӈгаюдаць 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ненэцяӈгаюдонзь  
    
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ненэциен
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ненэциед
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ненэциеда
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ненэциениʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ненэциедиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ненэциедиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ненэциенаˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ненэциедаˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ненэциедоʼ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ненэциенась
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ненэциедась 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ненэциедась 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ненэциенинзь
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ненэциединзь
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ненэциединзь
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ненэциенаць 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ненэциедаць 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ненэциедонзь 
      
